Montana, session 2025, HB824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 61-3-403, MCA, is amended to read:
"61-3-403. Color and design of personalized license plates -- exception. Except as provided in
61-3-407 and 61-3-466, the personalized license plates must be the same color and design as standard license
plates and must consist of numbers or letters, or any combination of numbers or letters, not exceeding eight
positions and not less than two positions, provided that there are no conflicts with existing standard or special
license plate series under this title. A registration decal must be displayed on personalized license plates as
provided in 61-3-332. A county number decal may be displayed on personalized plates."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 824